Arkansas, session 2025, SB527.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code §§ 23-61-1002 and 23-61-1003 are amended to
read as follows:
23-61-1002. Legislative intent.
Notwithstanding any general or specific laws to the contrary, it is the
intent of the General Assembly for the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me
Program to be a fiscally sustainable, cost-effective, and opportunity-driven
program that:
(1) Achieves comprehensive and innovative healthcare reform that
reduces the rate of growth in state and federal obligations for providing
healthcare coverage to low-income adults in Arkansas;
*JMB503*
04-07-2025 15:51:55 JMB503

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB527
(2) Reduces the maternal and infant mortality rates in the state
through initiatives that promote healthy outcomes for eligible women with
high-risk pregnancies;
(3) Promotes the health, welfare, and stability of mothers and
their infants after birth through hospital-based community bridge
organizations;
(4) Encourages personal responsibility for individuals to
demonstrate that they value healthcare coverage and understand their roles
and obligations in maintaining private insurance coverage;
(5) Increases opportunities for full-time work and attainment of
economic independence, especially for certain young adults previously
incarcerated individuals, to reduce long-term poverty that is associated with
additional risk for disease and premature death;
(6) Addresses health-related social needs of Arkansans in rural
counties through hospital-based community bridge organizations and reduces
the additional risk for disease and premature death associated with living in
a rural county;
(7) Strengthens the financial stability of the critical access
hospitals and other small, rural hospitals; and
(8) Fills gaps in the continuum of care for individuals in need
of services for serious mental illness and substance use disorders; and
(9) Recognizes that rebates are an important instrument to
ensure affordability and access to pharmaceutical products by eligible
individuals and to maximize the use of rebates when available to ensure the
fiscal sustainability of the program.

23-61-1003. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Acute care hospital” means a hospital that:
(A) Is licensed by the Department of Health under § 20-9-
201 et seq., as a general hospital or a surgery and general medical care
hospital; and
(B) Is enrolled as a provider with the Arkansas Medicaid
Program;
(2) “Birthing hospital” means a hospital in this state or in a
border state that:
04-07-2025 15:51:55 JMB503

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB527
(A) Is licensed as a general hospital;
(B) Provides obstetrics services; and
(C) Is enrolled as a provider with the Arkansas Medicaid
Program;
(3) “Community bridge organization” means an a hospital,
federally qualified health center, or another organization that is authorized
by the Department of Human Services to participate in the economic
independence initiative or the health improvement initiative to:
(A) Screen and refer Arkansans to resources available in
their communities to address health-related social needs; and
(B) Assist eligible individuals identified as target
populations most at risk of disease and premature death and who need a higher
level of intervention to improve their health outcomes and succeed in meeting
their long-term goals to achieve independence, including economic
independence;
(4) “Cost sharing” means the portion of the cost of a covered
medical service that is required to be paid by or on behalf of an eligible
individual;
(5) “Critical access hospital” means an acute care hospital that
is:
(A) Designated by the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid
Services as a critical access hospital; and
(B) Is enrolled as a provider in the Arkansas Medicaid
Program;
(6) “Economic independence initiative” means an initiative
developed by the Department of Human Services that is designed to promote
economic stability by encouraging participation of program participants to
engage in full-time, full-year work, and to demonstrate the value of
enrollment in an individual qualified health insurance plan through
incentives and disincentives;
(7) “Eligible individual” means an individual who is in the
eligibility category created by section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) of the Social
Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396a, as existing on January 1, 2025;
(8) “Employer health insurance coverage” means a health
insurance benefit plan offered by an employer or, as authorized by this
subchapter, an employer self-funded insurance plan governed by the Employee
04-07-2025 15:51:55 JMB503

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB527
Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, Pub. L. No. 93-406, as amended;
(9) "Federally qualified health center” means an entity as
defined by 42 C.F.R. § 405.2401, as existing on January 1, 2025, and that has
entered into an agreement with the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services
to meet Medicare program requirements under 42 C.F.R. § 405.2434, as existing
on January 1, 2025;
(9)(10) “Health improvement initiative” means an initiative
developed by an individual qualified health insurance plan or the Department
of Human Services that is designed to encourage the participation of eligible
individuals in health assessments and wellness programs, including fitness
programs and smoking or tobacco cessation programs;
(10)(11) “Health insurance benefit plan” means a policy,
contract, certificate, or agreement offered or issued by a health insurer to
provide, deliver, arrange for, pay for, or reimburse any of the costs of
healthcare services, but not including excepted benefits as defined under 42
U.S.C. § 300gg-91(c), as it existed on January 1, 2021 January 1, 2025;
(11)(12) “Health insurance marketplace” means the applicable
entities that were designed to help individuals, families, and businesses in
Arkansas shop for and select health insurance benefit plans in a way that
permits comparison of available plans based upon price, benefits, services,
and quality, and refers to either:
(A) The Arkansas Health Insurance Marketplace created
under the Arkansas Health Insurance Marketplace Act, § 23-61-801 et seq., or
a successor entity; or
(B) The federal health insurance marketplace or federal
health benefit exchange created under the Patient Protection and Affordable
Care Act, Pub. L. No. 111-148;
(12)(13) “Health insurer” means an insurer authorized by the
State Insurance Department to provide health insurance or a health insurance
benefit plan in the State of Arkansas, including without limitation:
(A) An insurance company;
(B) A medical services plan;
(C) A hospital plan;
(D) A hospital medical service corporation;
(E) A health maintenance organization;
(F) A fraternal benefits society;
04-07-2025 15:51:55 JMB503

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB527
(G) Any other entity providing health insurance or a
health insurance benefit plan subject to state insurance regulation; or
(H) A risk-based provider organization licensed by the
Insurance Commissioner under § 20-77-2704;
(13)(14) “Healthcare coverage” means coverage provided under
this subchapter through either an individual qualified health insurance plan,
a risk-based provider organization, employer health insurance coverage, or
the fee-for-service Arkansas Medicaid Program;
(14)(15) “Individual qualified health insurance plan” means an
individual health insurance benefit plan offered by a health insurer that
participates in the health insurance marketplace to provide coverage in
Arkansas that covers only essential health benefits as defined by Arkansas
rule and 45 C.F.R. § 156.110 and any federal insurance regulations, as they
existed on January 1, 2021 January 1, 2025;
(16) "Medical-loss ratio” means the percentage of premium income
that health insurers spend on medical care and quality improvement as opposed
to administration, marketing, and, if applicable, profit;
(15)(17) “Member” means a program participant who is enrolled in
an individual qualified health insurance plan;
(18)(A) ”Pharmacy rebate” means a discount, other price
concession, or a payment that is:
(i) Based on utilization of a prescription drug; and
(ii) Paid by a manufacturer or third party, directly
or indirectly, to a pharmacy benefits manager, pharmacy services
administrative organization, or pharmacy after a claim has been processed and
paid at a pharmacy.
(B) "Pharmacy rebate" includes without limitation
incentives, disbursements, and reasonable estimates of a volume-based
discount;
(16)(19) “Premium” means:
(A) A a monthly fee that is required to be paid by or on
behalf of an eligible individual to maintain some or all health insurance
benefits; and
(B) The amount paid by the Department of Human Services to
a health insurer on behalf of a program participant for cost-sharing
obligations in excess of or other than the program participant's cost-sharing
04-07-2025 15:51:55 JMB503

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB527
obligations;
(17)(20) “Program participant” means an eligible individual who:
(A) Is at least nineteen (19) years of age and no more
than sixty-four (64) years of age with an income that meets the income
eligibility standards established by rule of the Department of Human
Services;
(B) Is authenticated to be a United States citizen or
documented qualified alien according to the Personal Responsibility and Work
Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-193;
(C) Is not eligible for Medicare or advanced premium tax
credits through the health insurance marketplace; and
(D) Is not determined by the Department of Human Services
to be medically frail or eligible for services through a risk-based provider
organization;
(18)(21) “Risk-based provider organization” means the same as
defined in § 20-77-2703; and
(19)(22) “Small rural hospital” means a critical access hospital
or a general hospital that:
(A) Is located in a rural area;
(B) Has fifty (50) or fewer staffed beds; and
(C) Is enrolled as a provider in the Arkansas Medicaid
Program.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 23-61-1004(c)(2)(D), concerning the
administration of the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program, is
amended to read as follows:
(D) At least two (2) health insurers offer individual
qualified health insurance plans are offered in each county in the state.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 23-61-1004(d)(1), concerning a memorandum
of understanding specifying duties and obligations of each party in the
operation of the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program, is amended
to read as follows:
(d)(1) The Department of Human Services, the State Insurance
Department, and each of the individual qualified health insurance plans shall
enter into a memorandum of understanding that shall specify, consistent with
04-07-2025 15:51:55 JMB503

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB527
this subchapter, the duties and obligations of each party in the operation of
the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program, including provisions
necessary to effectuate the purchasing guidelines and reporting requirements,
at least thirty (30) calendar days before the annual open enrollment period.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 23-61-1004(e)(2), concerning the duties of
the Department of Human Services under the Arkansas Health and Opportunity
for Me Act of 2021, is amended to read as follows:
(2)(A) Establish and maintain a process for premium payments,
advanced cost-sharing reduction payments, and reconciliation payments to
health insurers.
(B) The process described in subdivision (e)(2)(A) of this
section shall attribute any unpaid member liabilities as solely the financial
obligation of the individual member.
(C) The Department of Human Services shall not include any
unpaid individual member obligation in any payment or financial
reconciliation with health insurers or in a future premium rate.
(D) The Department of Human Services shall establish and
maintain a process for tracking all pharmacy rebates obtained by
participating health plans from pharmaceutical companies and ensure that an
amount equal to the pharmacy rebates is remitted to this state on a quarterly
basis; and

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 23-61-1004(g), concerning the
administration of the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program, is
amended to add an additional subdivision to read as follows:
(3) A health insurer shall seek all available pharmacy rebates
from pharmaceutical companies for products covered through qualified health
plans participating in the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 23-61-1004(h), concerning the
administration of the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Act of 2021
relating to the authority for a block grant, is amended to read as follows:
(h)(1) The Governor shall request a block grant under relevant federal
law and regulations for the funding of the Arkansas Medicaid Program as soon
as practical if the federal law or regulations change to allow the approval
04-07-2025 15:51:55 JMB503

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB527
of a block grant for this purpose.
(2)(A) The Governor shall request a waiver under relevant
federal law and regulations for a work requirement as a condition of
maintaining coverage in the Arkansas Medicaid Program as soon as practical if
the federal law or regulations change to allow the approval of a waiver for
this purpose.
(B) An eligible individual enrolled in the Arkansas Health
and Opportunity for Me Program shall:
(i) Comply with any and all federal and state work
requirements under the Arkansas Medicaid Program, including providing
required information to demonstrate compliance; and
(ii) Be exempt from the work requirement under this
section if the eligible individual:
(a) Volunteers twenty (20) hours or more per
week as determined by the Department of Human Services;
(b) Meets any combination of working and
participating in a work program for a total of twenty (20) hours or more per
week as determined by the Department of Human Services;
(c) Participates and complies with the
requirements of a workfare program;
(d) Receives unemployment compensation and
complies with work requirements that are a part of the unemployment
compensation system;
(e) Participates in a drug addiction or
alcoholic treatment or rehabilitation program;
(f) Provides care for a dependent child who:
(1) Has a serious medical condition or a
disability; or
(2) Is under six (6) years of age; or
(g) Is at least one (1) of the following:
(1) Medically certified as physically or
mentally unfit for employment;
(2) Pregnant;
(3) Under nineteen (19) years of age; or
(4) Over fifty-nine (59) years of age.
(C)(i) An individual who is not exempt under subdivision
04-07-2025 15:51:55 JMB503

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB527
(h)(2)(B) of this section and who refuses to cooperate and declines to make
efforts to comply with the work requirements under this section shall have
coverage under the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program suspended
for the remainder of the plan year.
(ii) An individual who has coverage suspended under
subdivision (h)(2)(C)(i) of this section may regain active coverage under the
Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program if he or she cooperates and
demonstrates a clear intention to comply with the work requirements under
this section.
(iii) The Department of Human Services shall not
make monthly premium payments or advanced cost-sharing reduction payments to
a health insurer during a period of suspended coverage of the individual
under this subdivision (h)(2)(C).

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 23-61-1007(a), concerning the insurance
standards for individual qualified health insurance plans within the Arkansas
Health and Opportunity for Me Act of 2021, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Insurance coverage for a member enrolled in an individual
qualified health insurance plan shall be obtained, at a minimum, through
silver-level metallic plans as provided in 42 U.S.C. § 18022(d) and 42 U.S.C.
§ 18071, as they existed on January 1, 2021 January 1, 2025, that restrict
out-of-pocket costs to amounts that do not exceed applicable out-of-pocket
cost limitations.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 23-61-1007(c)(3)(A), concerning the
insurance standards for individual qualified health insurance plans, is
amended to read as follows:
(3)(A) Maintain a medical-loss ratio of at least eighty percent
(80%) eighty-five percent (85%) for an individual qualified health insurance
plan as required permitted under 45 C.F.R. § 158.210(c) 45 C.F.R. § 158.211,
as it existed on January 1, 2021 January 1, 2025, or rebate the difference
between the health insurer’s actual medical-loss ratio and eighty-five
percent (85%) to the Department of Human Services for members.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 23-61-1007(c)(5), concerning the insurance
standards for individual qualified health insurance plans, is amended to read
04-07-2025 15:51:55 JMB503

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB527
as follows:
(5) Make reports to the Department of Human Services and the
Department of Health regarding quality and performance metrics in a manner
and frequency established by a memorandum of understanding.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 23-61-1009 is amended to read as follows:
23-61-1009. Sunset.
This subchapter shall expire on December 31, 2026 expires December 31,
2031.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 23-61-1011(h), concerning the Health and
Economic Outcomes Accountability Oversight Advisory Panel, is amended to read
as follows:
(h) The Department of Human Services shall produce and submit a
quarterly report incorporating the advisory panel's findings recommendations
to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of
Representatives, and the public on the progress in health and economic
improvement resulting from the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me
Program, including without limitation:
(1) Eligibility and enrollment;
(2) Participation in and the impact of the economic independence
initiative and the health improvement initiative of the eligible individuals,
health insurers, and community bridge organizations;
(3) Utilization of medical services;
(4) Premium and cost-sharing reduction costs; and
(5) Health insurer participation and completion.

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 26-57-603(a), concerning the tax reports
relating to the insurance premium tax, is amended to read as follows:
(a) Each authorized, each formerly authorized, and each unauthorized
insurer as defined in § 23-60-102(12) shall file with the Insurance
Commissioner on or before March 1 of each year a report in form as prescribed
by the commissioner showing, except as to wet marine and foreign trade
insurance as defined in § 26-57-605(d), total direct premium income including
policy, membership, and other fees, and all other considerations for
insurance, from all kinds and classes of insurance, whether designated as
04-07-2025 15:51:55 JMB503

As Engrossed: S4/7/25 SB527
premium or otherwise, including all amounts paid for cost sharing by the
Department of Human Services to a health insurer under the Arkansas Health
and Opportunity for Me Act of 2021, § 23-61-1001 et seq., written by it
during the preceding calendar year on account of policies and contracts
covering property, subjects, or risks located, resident, or to be performed
in this state, with proper proportionate allocation of premium as to the
persons, property, subjects, or risks in this state insured under policies or
contracts covering persons, property, subjects, or risks located or resident
in more than one (1) state, after deducting from the total direct premium
income dividends and similar returns paid or credited to policyholders other
than as to life insurance, applicable cancellations, returned premiums, the
unabsorbed portion of any deposit premium, and the amount of reduction in, or
refund of, premiums allowed to industrial life policyholders for payment of
premiums directly to an office of the insurer.

/s/Irvin




















04-07-2025 15:51:55 JMB503